Utah statutes.
38-1a-302.   Land covered by lien -- Multiple lots occupied by improvement -- What a lien attaches to.

(1)  A preconstruction or construction lien extends to and covers as much of the land on which the improvement is made as necessary for the convenient use and occupation of the land.

(2)  If an improvement occupies two or more lots or other subdivisions of land, the lots or subdivisions are considered as one for the purposes of this chapter.

(3)  A preconstruction or construction lien attaches to all franchises, privileges, appurtenances, machinery, and fixtures pertaining to or used in connection with the improvement.

